Hawaii statutes.
[§556A-5] Terms-of-service agreement.
(a) This chapter does not change or impair a right of a custodian or a user
under a terms-of-service agreement to access and use digital assets of the
user.

(b) This chapter does not give a fiduciary or
designated recipient any new or expanded rights other than those held by the
user for whom, or for whose estate, the fiduciary or designated recipient acts
or represents.

(c) A fiduciary's or designated recipient's
access to digital assets may be modified or eliminated by a user, by federal
law, or by a terms-of-service agreement if the user has not provided direction
under section 556A-4. [L 2016, c 162, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next